src/fst/stems/postpositions.lexc
!! Dene Suline postpositions

LEXICON p
+Po: # ;
+PI+: VerbPrefixes ;

LEXICON Postpositions
        postposstems ;
1Sg+:se postposstems ;
2Sg+:ne postposstems ;
3Sg+:be postposstems ;
4Sg+:ye postposstems ;
1Du+:nuhe postposstems ;
2Du+:nuhe postposstems ;
3Du+:hube postposstems ;
1Pl+:nuhe postposstems ;
2Pl+:nuhe postposstems ;
3Pl+:hube postposstems ;
Ar+:ho  postposstems ;

Recipr+:ɂełe postposstems ;
Refl+:ɂede postposstems ;


LEXICON postposstems
yé p ;
ba p ;
